Washington statutes.
RCW 39.80.010

Legislative declaration.

The legislature hereby establishes a state policy, to the extent provided in this chapter, that governmental agencies publicly announce requirements for architectural and engineering services, and negotiate contracts for architectural and engineering services on the basis of demonstrated competence and qualification for the type of professional services required and at fair and reasonable prices.

[ 1981 c 61 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 c 61: "This act shall take effect on January 1, 1982." [ 1981 c 61 s 9.]